North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-06 General Provisions

54-06-01.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Appointed or appointive state officers and members of appointive state boards, bureaus, and commissions, and deputies, assistants, secretaries, clerks, and employees” includes all persons whose office or employment is held by virtue of any appointment or employment however made, other than an election by the voters of the state, whether or not such office or employment is created by an act of the legislative assembly.

“Elected and elective state officers” includes the governor, the lieutenant governor, the attorney general, the secretary of state, the state auditor, the state treasurer, the superintendent of public instruction, the agriculture commissioner, the insurance commissioner, the tax commissioner, and three public service commissioners.

Source:

I.M. Nov. 8, 1932, § 3, S.L. 1933, p. 505; R.C. 1943, § 54-0601; S.L. 1995, ch. 334, § 3.

Cross-References.

Deputies, see N.D.C.C. ch. 44-03.

Eligibility and qualifications, see N.D.C.C. ch. 44-01.

Nepotism prohibited, see N.D.C.C. §§ 44-04-09, 44-04-10.

Oath of office, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-05.

Removal from office, see N.D.C.C. chs. 44-09, 44-10, 44-11.

Vacancies in office, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-04 and N.D.C.C. ch. 44-02.

54-06-02.
State officers reside at capital. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 506, § 1.

54-06-03.
Report of state officers and boards.

Except as otherwise provided by law, all officers, departments, boards, commissions, and state institutions that make and transmit reports annually or biennially to the governor and the secretary of state shall submit their reports to the governor and the secretary of state not later than December first of the year in which the report is required to be made.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 119, § 34; R.C. 1895, § 73; R.C. 1899, § 73; S.L. 1901, ch. 139, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 73; S.L. 1913, ch. 246, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 95; R.C. 1943, § 54-0603; S.L. 1963, ch. 346, § 1; 1973, ch. 403, § 42; 1975, ch. 466, § 44; 1995, ch. 350, § 41.

54-06-04.
Form and number of reports to be submitted. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The following executive and administrative officers and departments shall submit to the governor and the secretary of state reports covering their operations for the two preceding fiscal years, except as otherwise provided by law, not later than the first day of December each year after the regular session of the legislative assembly:

Secretary of state.

State auditor.

Insurance commissioner.

Attorney general.

Agriculture commissioner.

Superintendent of public instruction.

State tax commissioner.

Public service commission.

Department of corrections and rehabilitation.

Department of transportation.

State department of health.

Department of human services.

Workforce safety and insurance.

Office of management and budget.

State treasurer.

Labor commissioner.

Department of financial institutions.

Game and fish department.

Industrial commission.

Job service North Dakota.

Board of university and school lands.

Department of environmental quality.

A committee composed of the director of the state historical society, the state librarian, and the secretary of state, or other persons designated to represent them, shall meet at the call of the secretary of state to set the requirements for form, style, materials, and content of biennial reports.

This section does not prohibit the executive and administrative officers and departments enumerated in subsection 1 from receiving additional copies of their reports as may be available and printed.

All officers, departments, boards, commissions, and state institutions that submit reports covering their operations for the two preceding fiscal years to the governor and the secretary of state shall submit copies of their reports in the form and style, using the materials, and having the content prescribed under subsection 2 on or before the first day of December in each year after the regular session of the legislative assembly. If submitted, one copy of each report must be also distributed to the following agencies:

Legislative council.

Office of management and budget.

State law library.

The libraries of each state institution of higher education.

State archivist for official and public use.

All executive and administrative officers and departments that submit reports under this section shall bear the costs of the preparation and any printing of the reports.

All reports required under this section to be submitted to the secretary of state must be subsequently transmitted by the secretary of state to the state archivist for official and public use following their receipt and review by the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 119, § 34; R.C. 1895, § 73; R.C. 1899, § 73; S.L. 1901, ch. 139, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 73; S.L. 1913, ch. 246, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 95; R.C. 1943, § 54-0604; S.L. 1963, ch. 346, § 2; 1969, ch. 448, § 25; 1973, ch. 403, § 43; 1975, ch. 466, § 45; 1983, ch. 82, § 126; 1989, ch. 72, § 18; 1991, ch. 592, § 29; 1991, ch. 714, § 18; 1993, ch. 5, § 19; 1993, ch. 613, § 5; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 350, § 42; 1999, ch. 446, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 88, § 88; 2001, ch. 488, § 25; 2001, ch. 503, § 12; 2003, ch. 459, § 5; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2017, ch. 199, § 56, effective April 29, 2019.

Note.

This section is effective upon the receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the chief of the environmental health section of the state department of health attesting that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and all necessary federal and other agreements have been amended to ensure the state will continue to meet the primacy requirements it currently satisfies after the transfer of authority, powers, and duties from the state department of health to the department of environmental quality provided under
S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 75. [Contingency met in 2019]

Cross-References.

State engineer to report as prescribed in this section, see N.D.C.C. § 61-03-04.

54-06-04.
Form and number of reports to be submitted. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The following executive and administrative officers and departments shall submit to the governor and the secretary of state reports covering their operations for the two preceding fiscal years, except as otherwise provided by law, not later than the first day of December each year after the regular session of the legislative assembly:

Secretary of state.

State auditor.

Insurance commissioner.

Attorney general.

Agriculture commissioner.

Superintendent of public instruction.

State tax commissioner.

Public service commission.

Department of corrections and rehabilitation.

Department of transportation.

Workforce safety and insurance.

Office of management and budget.

State treasurer.

Labor commissioner.

Department of financial institutions.

Game and fish department.

Industrial commission.

Job service North Dakota.

Board of university and school lands.

Department of environmental quality.

A committee composed of the director of the state historical society, the state librarian, and the secretary of state, or other persons designated to represent them, shall meet at the call of the secretary of state to set the requirements for form, style, materials, and content of biennial reports.

This section does not prohibit the executive and administrative officers and departments enumerated in subsection 1 from receiving additional copies of their reports as may be available and printed.

All officers, departments, boards, commissions, and state institutions that submit reports covering their operations for the two preceding fiscal years to the governor and the secretary of state shall submit copies of their reports in the form and style, using the materials, and having the content prescribed under subsection 2 on or before the first day of December in each year after the regular session of the legislative assembly. If submitted, one copy of each report must be also distributed to the following agencies:

Legislative council.

Office of management and budget.

State law library.

The libraries of each state institution of higher education.

State archivist for official and public use.

All executive and administrative officers and departments that submit reports under this section shall bear the costs of the preparation and any printing of the reports.

All reports required under this section to be submitted to the secretary of state must be subsequently transmitted by the secretary of state to the state archivist for official and public use following their receipt and review by the secretary of state.

Department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 119, § 34; R.C. 1895, § 73; R.C. 1899, § 73; S.L. 1901, ch. 139, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 73; S.L. 1913, ch. 246, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 95; R.C. 1943, § 54-0604; S.L. 1963, ch. 346, § 2; 1969, ch. 448, § 25; 1973, ch. 403, § 43; 1975, ch. 466, § 45; 1983, ch. 82, § 126; 1989, ch. 72, § 18; 1991, ch. 592, § 29; 1991, ch. 714, § 18; 1993, ch. 5, § 19; 1993, ch. 613, § 5; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 350, § 42; 1999, ch. 446, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 88, § 88; 2001, ch. 488, § 25; 2001, ch. 503, § 12; 2003, ch. 459, § 5; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2017, ch. 199, § 56, effective April 29, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 484, effective September 1, 2022.

54-06-04.1.
State agencies, departments, and institutions charging fees shall make reports.

All state agencies, departments, and institutions which license, inspect, or regulate private business activities or products and charge fees for such services, except the secretary of state, shall prepare and submit to the office of the budget, with the budget estimates required by section 54-44.1-04, a report for the last two fiscal years giving information about the costs of providing each service and the fees charged for the granting or providing of such service. The report must accurately present the costs and revenues in accordance with the various categories of service and such report must be completed and supported by such accounting records and allocation procedures as are acceptable to the director of the budget.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 489, § 1; 1973, ch. 412, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 127; 1983, ch. 553, § 1.

54-06-04.2.
Information to employees on state employee health and retirement and social security benefit program contributions and premiums paid by the state.

A report providing a summary of payments made by the state for premiums and contributions for state employee insurance, retirement, and federal social security benefit programs for each state employee must be provided to each employee every calendar year. The report must be in a form adopted by those state agencies and institutions responsible for preparing state employee payrolls. The information provided must include any portion of required employee retirement program contributions paid by the state on behalf of the employee and must include the accumulated state payments for these benefit programs for the current calendar year.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 559, § 1.

54-06-04.3.
Joint publication and distribution of information by state agencies — Fees.

Any state agency may cooperate with any other state agency to jointly publish and distribute information and may arrange to have the joint publication or distribution, or both, coordinated by a private entity. Any state agency may provide information it has collected or developed, including mailing lists, to each other or to any private entity for the purpose of distributing jointly or individually issued publications or other information. If a state agency publication is available on the agency’s website or otherwise available in an electronic format and a person requests a paper copy of the publication, the state agency may charge a reasonable fee for providing the paper copy and for mailing the paper copy of the publication.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 568, § 3; 2017, ch. 14, § 25, effective July 1, 2017.

54-06-05.
Office of management and budget may condense report — Number of copies of report. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 350, § 56.

54-06-06.
Salaries of state officers and employees — Periodic payment.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the office of management and budget shall prepare warrants for the salaries of state officers and employees not less frequently than monthly as the same become due.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 10, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 337; R.C. 1899, § 337; R.C. 1905, § 392; C.L. 1913, § 655; R.C. 1943, § 54-0606; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 66; 2003, ch. 388, § 4.

54-06-07.
Salaries full compensation — Fees paid over to state treasurer.

All salaries of elective and appointive state officers shall be full compensation for all official services. All fees, which are not otherwise by the laws of this state directed to be deposited in a special fund or disbursed for a special purpose, received or charged by any elective or appointive officer or deputy state officer for any act or service rendered in the officer’s official capacity must be accounted for and paid over by the officer monthly to the state treasurer and must be credited to the general fund of the state.

Source:

I.M. Nov. 8, 1932, § 6, S.L. 1933, p. 505; 1933, ch. 196, § 2; 1943, ch. 202, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 54-0607.

Cross-References.

Officers to account for moneys collected, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-07.

Collateral References.

Constitutional provision fixing or limiting salary of public officer as precluding allowance for expenses or disbursements, 5 A.L.R.2d 1182.

Payment of salary to de facto officer as defense to action or proceeding by de jure officer for salary, 64 A.L.R.2d 1375.

54-06-08.
Record of fees kept by state officers — Report to state treasurer.

Every state officer or deputy state officer required by the Constitution of North Dakota, or by any provision of the laws of this state, to pay into the state treasury all fees and profits arising from such office, shall keep a record of all such fees or profits in a book kept for that purpose. Such book is the property of the state. Each officer shall report to the state treasurer monthly the amount of fees or profits received, verified by oath, and at the same time shall pay the amount of such fees or profits to the treasurer, taking duplicate receipts therefor. One of the receipts must be filed with the office of management and budget forthwith. The office of management and budget shall charge the state treasurer with the amount thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 183, § 7; 1891, ch. 1, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 327; R.C. 1899, § 327; S.L. 1901, ch. 95, §§ 1, 3; R.C. 1905, § 379; C.L. 1913, § 638; R.C. 1943, § 54-0608; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 67; 1975, ch. 106, § 577.

Cross-References.

Examination of state officers by state auditor, see N.D.C.C. § 54-10-01.

Officers to account for money collected, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-07.

54-06-08.1.
Clearing accounts and cash balances maintained by state agencies.

All departments, institutions, or agencies of the state may maintain, subject to approval of the state auditor and the state treasurer, in the Bank of North Dakota, or, if the state entity is located outside Bismarck, in another state or federally chartered financial institution, an account for clearing or cashing of checks and making change. To accommodate peak processing periods, the balance in an account at a financial institution other than the Bank of North Dakota may exceed the maximum amount of federal insurance coverage available if the excess in the account is secured by another form of security or security deposit; however, the balance may exceed the maximum amount of federal insurance coverage available only for the time it takes to clear the checks. Any check written on the account may be used only to transfer funds to the Bank of North Dakota or the state treasurer. A financial institution shall report to the state auditor in writing within thirty days after opening or closing an account for a state entity under this section. Subject to the approval of the state auditor, a state entity may maintain a cash balance reasonable for the conduct of business at the location of the entity.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 343, § 1; 1989, ch. 633, § 1; 1995, ch. 497, § 1.

Cross-References.

Public fund depositories, see N.D.C.C. ch. 21-04.

54-06-08.2.
Payment by credit or debit card or by electronic fund transfer — State credit card processor — Fees.

A state agency, board, or commission, the judicial branch, or any political subdivision may accept payment by credit or debit card or by electronic fund transfer of any fee, interest, penalty, tax, or other payment that is due or collectible by the agency, board, or commission. The judicial branch may accept payment by credit or debit card or by electronic fund transfer for any fees, costs, or other assessments required or imposed under state law or court rule.

The Bank of North Dakota is the state credit card administrator for credit card transactions of state agencies, boards, or commissions. The Bank of North Dakota shall select a credit card processor or processors to provide credit card services to state agencies, boards, and commissions. All funds from credit card transactions must be deposited in the respective entity’s account in the Bank of North Dakota.

Except as otherwise provided under section 20.1-03-32, an executive branch agency may charge a fee to be added to a payment as a service charge for the acceptance of a payment made by a credit or debit card or an electronic fund transfer. The Bank of North Dakota shall adopt rules establishing the terms under which executive agencies may charge a service fee under this subsection to be in compliance with a credit card company’s rules and shall approve the amount that may be charged by an executive agency.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 498, § 1; 1997, ch. 437, § 1; 2009, ch. 15, § 17; 2011, ch. 391, § 1.

54-06-09.
Mileage and travel expense of state officers and employees.

State officials, whether elective or appointive, and their deputies, assistants, and clerks, or other state employees, entitled by law to be reimbursed for mileage or travel expense, must be allowed and paid for mileage and travel expense.

For each mile [1.61 kilometers] actually and necessarily traveled in the performance of official duty when the travel is by private airplane, the individual is entitled to a sum equal to one and one-half times the mileage reimbursement amount established under subdivision c for travel by motor vehicle. Mileage by private aircraft must be computed by actual air mileage when only one state employee or official is traveling; if two or more state employees or officials are traveling by private aircraft, the actual mileage must be based on the road mileage between the geographical points. Reimbursement for private airplane travel must be calculated as follows:

If reimbursement is for one properly authorized and reimbursable passenger, reimbursement must be paid on a per mile basis as provided in this subsection.

If reimbursement is claimed for a chartered private aircraft, reimbursement may not exceed the cost of regular coach fare on a commercial flight, if one is scheduled between the point of departure, point of destination, and return, for each properly authorized and reimbursable passenger on the charter flight; or, where there is no such regularly scheduled commercial flight, the actual cost of the charter.

Except as provided in subdivision a, when travel is by rail or certificated air taxi commercial operator or other common carrier, including regularly scheduled flights by airlines, the individual is entitled to reimbursement for the amount actually and necessarily expended therefor in the performance of official duties.

The director of the office of management and budget shall adopt policies establishing mileage reimbursement for actual and necessary travel in the performance of official duty when the travel is by motor vehicle, the use of which is required by the employing entity. The director shall amend the policies when necessary to set reimbursement at the same rate as established by the United States general services administration for privately owned vehicles.

No reimbursement may be paid for leased private aircraft, except for leased or rented private aircraft from a recognized fixed base aviation operator who is in the business of leasing and renting private aircraft and is located on an airport open for public use.

If only one person engages in such travel in a motor vehicle exceeding at any geographical point three hundred miles [482.80 kilometers] beyond the borders of this state, reimbursement is limited to eighteen cents per mile [1.61 kilometers] for miles driven in excess of six hundred miles [965.60 kilometers] of round trip out-of-state travel.

An official, deputy, assistant, clerk, or other employee, when required to travel by motor vehicle or truck in the performance of official duty, shall use a state-owned vehicle whenever possible unless exempted under section 24-02-03.3. However, an agency, institution, department, board, bureau, or commission may allow use of an official’s, deputy’s, or employee’s personal motor vehicle in circumstances authorized by the official, deputy, or the employee’s supervisor. If personal motor vehicle use is authorized under this subsection, the agency may also allow mileage reimbursement at a rate less than that otherwise provided in this section. When official travel is by motor vehicle or airplane owned by the state or by any department or political subdivision of the state, no allowance may be made or paid for such mileage, except that governmental entities may share expenses when officials or employees of those entities travel in the same motor vehicle or aircraft.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, state employees permanently located outside the state or on assignments outside the state for an indefinite period of time, exceeding at least thirty consecutive days, must be allowed and paid forty-five cents per mile [1.61 kilometers] for each mile [1.61 kilometers] actually and necessarily traveled in the performance of official duty when such travel is by motor vehicle, and the three-hundred-mile [482.80-kilometer] restriction imposed by subsection 3 does not apply.

Before any allowance for any such mileage or travel expenses may be made, the official, deputy, assistant, clerk, or other employee shall file with the employee’s department, institution, board, commission, or agency an itemized statement showing the mileage traveled, the hour of departure and return, the days when and how traveled, the purpose thereof, and such other information and documentation as may be prescribed by rule of the employee’s department, institution, board, commission, or agency. The statement must be submitted to the employee’s department, institution, board, commission, or agency for approval and must be paid only when approved by the employee’s department, institution, board, commission, or agency.

Source:

I.M. June 29, 1932, § 1, S.L. 1933, p. 496; 1937, ch. 187, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 54-0609; S.L. 1949, ch. 313, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 54-0609; S.L. 1959, ch. 325, § 1; 1963, ch. 347, § 1; 1965, ch. 304, § 5; 1967, ch. 382, § 1; 1969, ch. 399, § 2; 1971, ch. 448, § 2; 1973, ch. 413, § 1; 1973, ch. 414, § 1; 1975, ch. 418, § 3; 1975, ch. 467, § 1; 1979, ch. 479, § 2; 1981, ch. 455, § 3; 1983, ch. 495, § 4; 1985, ch. 501, § 2; 1991, ch. 569, § 1; 1993, ch. 507, § 1; 1995, ch. 427, § 2; 1997, ch. 41, § 10; 1997, ch. 435, § 2; 2001, ch. 472, § 1; 2001, ch. 473, § 2; 2005, ch. 475, § 1; 2007, ch. 455, § 1; 2009, ch. 386, § 7; 2011, ch. 391, § 2.

Cross-References.

Traveling expenses, see N.D.C.C. §§ 44-08-03 to 44-08-05.1.

54-06-09.1.
Certification of unlawful expense and traveling account — Penalty — Action for violation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

54-06-10.
Out-of-state travel — Authorization necessary. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 508, § 1.

54-06-11.
Amounts of bonds of state officers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 113, § 24.

54-06-12.
Publishing false statements — Penalty.

No state official may publish willfully any false statement in regard to any state department, institution, or industry which tends to deceive the public and create a distrust of any state official or employee in charge of such department, institution, or industry, or which tends to obstruct, hinder, and delay the various departments, institutions, and industries of the state. Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 1919, Sp., ch. 36, §§ 1, 4; 1925 Supp., §§ 9347a1, 9347a4; R.C. 1943, § 54-0612; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 578.

Collateral References.

Defamation: Privilege accorded state or local governmental administrative records relating to private individual member of public, 40 A.L.R.4th 318.

Defamation: nature and extent of privilege accorded public statements, relating to subject of legislative business or concern, made by member of state or local legislature or council outside of formal proceedings, 41 A.L.R.4th 1116.

54-06-13.
Salary limitations suspended. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

54-06-14.
Annual leave and sick leave for state employees.

Annual leave and sick leave must be provided for all persons in the permanent employment of this state who are not employed under a written contract of hire setting forth the terms and conditions of their employment, within the limitations, terms, and provisions of this section. Annual leave for an employee entitled to it must be within a range of a minimum of one working day per month of employment to a maximum of two working days per month of employment, based on tenure of employment, to be fixed by rules adopted by the employing unit. Sick leave for an employee entitled to it must be within a range of a minimum of one working day per month of employment to a maximum of one and one-half working days per month of employment, based on tenure of employment, to be fixed by rules adopted by the employing unit. Annual leave must be compensated for on the basis of full pay for the number of working days’ leave credited to the employee. Sick leave must be compensated for on the basis of full pay for absence due to illness on working days during tenure of employment. An employee with at least ten continuous years of state employment is entitled to a lump sum payment equal to one-tenth of the pay attributed to the employee’s unused sick leave accrued under this section. An employee’s years of state employment must be deemed continuous if, under the official personnel policy of an agency, unit, or entity, the employee’s work is terminated because of a reduction in force and the employee is reinstated in any agency, unit, or entity within two years, or if the employee is placed on voluntary leave status without pay and the leave lasts no longer than two years for education purposes, or one year for any other voluntary leave without pay. The pay attributed to the accumulated, unused sick leave must be computed on the basis of the employee’s salary or wage at the time the employee leaves the employ of the state and at the rate of one hour of pay for each hour of unused sick leave. The agency, unit, or entity that last employed the employee shall make the lump sum payment from funds appropriated by the legislative assembly to that agency, unit, or entity for salaries and wages. Any state agency, unit, or entity which employs persons subject to this section shall formulate and adopt rules governing the granting of annual leave and sick leave which will effectuate the purpose of this section and best suit the factors of employment of that employing unit. Each employing unit shall file with the office of management and budget a copy of the rules adopted, including any amendments or additions to the rules.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 378, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 634, § 1; 1991, ch. 570, § 1; 1991 Sp., ch. 887, § 1; 2003, ch. 460, § 1.

Note.

Chapter 378, S.L. 1965, included the following two sentences at the end of this section: “Each employee shall be required to take an annual leave, as provided for in this section. The accumulation of sick leave shall be limited to a total of one hundred twenty days”. As the House and Senate journals indicate that these sentences were not adopted, they have been omitted from this section.

54-06-14.1.
State leave sharing program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 509, § 1; 1995, ch. 499, § 1; repealed by 2021, ch. 394, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

54-06-14.2.
State sick leave sharing program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 510, § 1; 1995, ch. 499, § 2; repealed by 2021, ch. 394, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

54-06-14.3.
Disaster services, emergency medical services, and firefighter volunteers — Leave.

Upon issuance of an order or proclamation declaring a state of disaster or emergency pursuant to chapter 37-17.1, or a declaration of at least a level II disaster by the American red cross in this or any other state, the executive officer in charge of a state agency may grant a leave of absence to any full-time employee of that agency who is certified by the American red cross as a disaster services volunteer. The leave of absence must be for the purpose of allowing that employee, upon request by the American red cross, to participate in disaster relief services.

The executive officer in charge of a state agency may grant a paid leave of absence to a full-time employee of that agency who is an emergency medical services personnel volunteer or volunteer firefighter. The leave of absence must be for the purpose of allowing that employee to respond to an emergency at the request of an emergency medical services operation or fire department.

An individual on leave under this section is not deemed to be an employee of the state for the purposes of workforce safety and insurance. The cumulative leave granted under this section may not exceed five working days during any calendar year. The leave may not result in a loss of compensation, seniority, annual leave, sick leave, or accrued overtime for which the employee is otherwise eligible.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 438, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2019, ch. 430, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

54-06-14.4.
State employee leave for organ or bone marrow donation.

The executive officer in charge of a state agency may grant a leave of absence, not to exceed twenty workdays, to an employee for the purpose of donating an organ or bone marrow. Notwithstanding the limitations for the donation and use of donated leave under section 54-06-14.7, an employee may request and use donated annual leave or sick leave for the purpose of donating an organ or bone marrow. If an employee requests donations of sick leave or annual leave, but does not receive the full amount needed for the donation of an organ or bone marrow, the executive officer of the state agency may grant a paid leave of absence for the remainder of the leave up to the maximum total of twenty workdays. The executive officer of the state agency may require verification by a physician regarding the purpose of the leave requested and information from the physician regarding the length of the leave requested. Any paid leave of absence granted under this section may not result in a loss of compensation, seniority, annual leave, sick leave, or accrued overtime for which the employee is otherwise eligible.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 476, § 2; 2021, ch. 394, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

54-06-14.5.
Use of sick leave and annual leave — Birth or adoption — Family leave priority.

During the first six months following birth or placement, an employer shall grant an employee’s request to use up to six weeks of sick leave under section 54-06-14 to care for the employee’s newborn child or to care for a child placed with the employee, by a child-placing agency licensed under chapter 50-12, for adoption or placed with the employee as a precondition to adoption under section 14-15-12, but not both. The employer shall compensate the employee for leave used by the employee under this subsection on the same basis as the employee would be compensated if the leave had been taken due to the employee’s illness, medical needs, or health needs. This subsection does not prevent an employee from using sick leave for the employee’s illness, medical needs, or health needs following the birth of a child or from using leave under section 54-52.4-03.

If an employee requests to use annual leave under section 54-06-14 for any of the reasons identified under subsection 1 of section 54-52.4-02, the employer shall give priority to the request.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 369, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; enacted by 2015, ch. 370, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The amendment of this section by
section 1 of chapter 370, S.L. 2015 became effective on August 1, 2015.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 54-06-14.5 was enacted and amended by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in section 1 of chapter 370, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1244; and section 1 of chapter 369, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1387.

54-06-14.6.
Sick leave for consequences of domestic violence, a sex offense, stalking, or terrorizing.

As used in this section:

“Domestic violence” has the same meaning as provided under section 14-07.1-01.

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, parent, child, or sibling as provided under section 12.1-17-07.1.

“Sex offense” means an offense under chapter 12.1-20.

“Stalking” means an offense under section 12.1-17-07.1.

“Terrorizing” means an offense under section 12.1-17-04.

Under section 54-06-14, an employing unit shall grant an employee’s request to use sick leave to:

Seek legal or law enforcement assistance or remedies to ensure the health and safety of the employee or employee’s immediate family members, including preparing for or participating in any civil or criminal legal proceeding related to or derived from domestic violence, a sex offense, stalking, or terrorizing;

Seek treatment by a health care provider for physical or mental injuries caused by domestic violence, a sex offense, stalking, or terrorizing, or to attend to health care treatment for a victim of such offenses who is the employee’s immediate family member;

Obtain or assist an immediate family member in obtaining services from a domestic violence shelter, rape crisis center, or other social services program for relief from domestic violence, a sex offense, stalking, or terrorizing;

Obtain or assist an immediate family member in obtaining mental health counseling related to an incident of domestic violence, sex offense, stalking, or terrorizing, in which the employee or the employee’s immediate family member was a victim of domestic violence, a sex offense, stalking, or terrorizing; or

Participate in safety planning, temporary or permanent relocation, or take other actions to increase the safety of the employee or employee’s family members from future domestic violence, a sex offense, stalking, or terrorizing.

In the discretion of the employee’s supervisor, the sick leave hours may be limited to forty hours per calendar year.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 368, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

54-06-14.7.
State leave sharing program — Rulemaking.

The human resource management services division of the office of management and budget shall establish a state leave sharing program for permanent employees of the state. The program must provide for a mechanism for state employees to donate accrued annual and sick leave to an employee who does not have available leave who is suffering from a severe, extreme, or life-threatening condition or who is caring for an immediate relative or household member who is suffering from a severe, extreme, or life-threatening condition.

A probationary, temporary, or contracted employee with a limited-term appointment is not eligible to participate in the leave sharing program. An employee may not use more than four months donated leave in any twelve-month period and an employee may not retain leave beyond the occurrence necessitating the leave.

The human resource management services division shall:

Require medical certification from a physician, physician assistant, psychologist, or advanced practice nurse practitioner verifying the severe, extreme, or life-threatening nature of the medical condition and the expected duration of the condition;

Track the amount of leave taken by permanent state employees under the program; and

Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 28-32 to implement this section.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 394, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

54-06-15.
Failure of officials and employees working in capitol building to return keys upon termination of employment — Duty of person in charge of employing unit — Payment of fee in lieu of return — Retention of final warrant for salary or wage.

Each elective or appointive official or state employee employed by, or in charge of, an employing unit with offices in the state capitol building who fails or is unable to return a key, or keys, issued to that person pursuant to section 54-21-17.1 shall have that person’s final warrant-check for payment of salary or wages retained by the person in charge of the employing unit, or the person’s designee, until the key or keys are returned, or until the fee in lieu of return provided in this section has been paid. Each official or employee who fails or is unable to return keys issued to the person in the manner provided in section 44-08-18 shall pay a fee of five dollars for each key not returned, which fee must be in lieu of return of a key. Upon receipt of the in lieu fee, the person in charge of the employing unit, or the person’s designee, shall release the official’s or employee’s final warrant-check for payment of salary or wages. When an official or employee terminates that person’s employment and fails or is unable to return a key, or keys, issued to that person, the person in charge of the employing unit, or the person’s designee, shall retain the final warrant-check for payment of the salary or wages of that official or employee until this section has been complied with. As used in this section, the phrase “employing unit” means any agency, department, board, commission, or other governmental unit, including the supreme court, the legislative assembly, and the legislative council, which has offices located in the state capitol building. The phrase “person in charge” means the person who has the overall supervisory and administrative control over the employing unit.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 490, § 2.

Cross-References.

Director of institutions to promulgate rules on issuance and return of keys to capitol building, see N.D.C.C. § 54-21-17.1.

Responsibility of officials and employees for keys, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-18.

54-06-16.
Minimum wage standards for employees of state. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 388, § 5.